Hawaii, session 2026, HB2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. PART II SECTION 2. There are appropriated from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (11): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds            $218,194            $461,643 Special funds            $832,498            $1,761,465 SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART III SECTION 4. There are appropriated from the sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (11): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds            $14,795             $31,046 Special funds            $77,099             $161,875 SECTION 5. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART IV SECTION 6. There are appropriated from the source of funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (11): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds            $219,746            $433,723 SECTION 7. Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART V SECTION 8.  There are appropriated from the source of funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (11): FY 2025-2026        FY 2026-2027 General funds            $11,300             $22,202 SECTION 9.  Funds appropriated by this part shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for the purposes of this part. PART VI SECTION 10. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be, from the respective funds. SECTION 11. The fiscal year 2025-2026 appropriations or authorizations under this Act shall not lapse until the end of the fiscal biennium 2025-2027; provided that funds appropriated or authorized by this Act that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2027, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 12. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.